District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.11

Consent to deductions.

Every teacher who shall continue in the service of the public schools of the District of Columbia after the passage of this part, as well as every person who hereafter may be appointed to a position as teacher in the public schools of the District of Columbia, shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for herein; and the salary, pay, or compensation, which may be paid monthly or at any other time, shall be full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for all services rendered by such teacher during the period covered by such payment, except his claim for the benefits to which he may be entitled under the provisions of this part, notwithstanding the provisions of the Act of June 20, 1906 (34 Stat. 316), and of any other law, rule, or regulation affecting the salary, pay, or compensation of the teachers employed in the service of the public schools of the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 880, ch. 779, § 11

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1233.
1973 Ed., § 31-731.